Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska8-192
Banks; possession by department; inventory of assets and liabilities; filing.

Upon taking charge of any bank, the director shall cause to be made an inventory in triplicate of all the property, assets, and liabilities of the bank so far as the property, assets, and liabilities of the bank can be ascertained. One copy of the inventory shall be filed with the director, one copy of the inventory retained in the bank, and, after the declaration of insolvency of the bank as provided in section 8-194, one copy of the inventory shall be filed with the clerk of the district court of the county in which the main office of the bank is located.

Laws 1929, c. 38, § 21, p. 167;

C.S.1929, § 8-188;

Laws 1933, c. 18, § 50, p. 161;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 8-188;

R.S.1943, § 8-178;

Laws 1963, c. 29, § 92, p. 170;

Laws 2017, LB140, § 89.

Under facts in this case, denial of motion for continuance under section 8-195 was not erroneous. Elm Creek State Bank v. Department of Banking, 191 Neb. 584, 216 N.W.2d 883 (1974).